Utah statutes.
63M-1-2203.   Transient Room Tax Fund -- Source of revenues -- Interest --
Expenditure or pledge of revenues.
(1)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund known as the Transient
Room Tax Fund.
(2) (a)  The fund shall be funded by the portion of the sales and use tax
described in Subsection 59-12-301(2).
(b) (i)  The fund shall earn interest.
(ii)  Any interest earned on fund monies shall be deposited into the fund.
(3) (a)  Subject to Subsection (3)(b), the director shall expend or pledge the
monies deposited into the fund:
(i)  to mitigate the impacts of traffic and parking relating to a convention
facility within a county of the first class;
(ii)  for a purpose listed in Section 17-31-2, except that any requirements in
Section 17-31-2 for the expenditure of monies do not apply; or
(iii)  for a combination of Subsections (3)(a)(i) and (ii).
(b)  The director may not expend more than $20,000,000 in total to mitigate
the impacts of traffic and parking relating to a convention facility within a
county of the first class.
